Utah statutes.
54-4-1.5.   Investigations, providing information, audits and recommendations by director.

In addition to its other powers and duties provided by law, the Public Service Commission may, with respect to any matter within its jurisdiction, order the director of the Division of Public Utilities to:

(1)  conduct research, studies, and investigations;

(2)  provide information, documents or records in compliance with the provisions regarding ex parte communications set forth in Section 54-7-1.5;

(3)  conduct audits and inspections or take other enforcement actions to assure compliance with commission decisions and state and federal laws; and

(4)  make recommendations regarding public utility regulations.

